Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 5. Mortgage, Lease or Sale

Cross references. —

As to sale and redemption of real property sold under mortgage or execution, see §§

1-18-101

to

1-18-112

.

As to sale of corporate stock under execution or attachment, see §§

1-19-101

to

1-19-108

.

As to property exempt from execution or attachment, see §§

1-20-101

to

1-20-106

and

1-20-108

.

As to deeds, mortgages and leases generally, see §§

34-2-101

to

34-2-135

.

As to foreclosure of mortgages generally, see §§

34-4-103

to

34-4-113

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts §§ 441 to 626.

Liability of trustee for payments or conveyances under a trust subsequently held to be invalid, 77 ALR4th 1177.

33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 322, 323; 39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward §§ 122 to 132; 90A C.J.S. Trusts §§ 462 to 481.

§ 2-3-501.
Authorization by court; generally.

Whenever in any estate or guardianship now being administered or that may hereafter be administered, it appears to the court to be for the advantage of the estate or ward to raise money upon a note or notes secured by a mortgage of the real or personal property of any decedent or ward or to make a lease of such real property, or it appears to the court that the homestead of a minor or incompetent is mortgaged and the mortgage thereon is subject to foreclosure, and the guardian does not have sufficient money in the estate of the person to pay the mortgage, the court may as often as occasion therefor shall arise in the administration of the estate or guardianship, on petition, notice and hearing as provided in this article, authorize and direct the executor, administrator or guardian to mortgage the personal or real property, including release and waiver of homestead of the ward, and to execute a note or notes secured by the mortgage, or to lease the real estate, or any part thereof.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6967; R.S. 1931, § 88-3401; Laws 1935, ch. 125, § 1; 1937, ch. 34, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 8-201; W.S. 1957, § 4-23; W.S. 1977, §

4-5-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Waiver by parties or participants of irregularities or defects in judicial sale by trustee, 2 A.L.R.2d 6.

Necessity of consent of court to tax sale of property in custody of trustee appointed by court, 3 ALR2d 893.

Right of trustee other than person named in will as such to execute power of sale conferred by will, 9 ALR2d 1324.

Misstatement in trustee's or mortgagee's report as to amount for which property has been sold under power of sale as ground for avoiding sale, 22 ALR2d 979.

Implied power of testamentary trustee to sell real property, 23 ALR2d 1000.

Trustee's power to employ broker or agent to sell estate property, 47 ALR2d 1379.

Power of trustee and court as regards term of lease of trust property, 67 ALR2d 978.

Rights and remedies of one purchasing at trustee's sale where there was a misrepresentation or mistake as to acreage or boundaries of tract sold, 69 ALR2d 254.

Power of trustee with power to sell or to lease real property, or to do both, to give an option to purchase, 83 ALR2d 1310.

Broker's fees on sale or lease of trust property as chargeable against principal or interest, 94 ALR2d 1306.

Validity and construction of trust provision authorizing trustee to purchase trust property, 39 ALR3d 836.

§ 2-3-502.
Authorization by court; contents of petition; hearing; objections; terms, etc., of order.

A petition to mortgage or lease under W.S.

2-3-501

, or a petition to transfer, sell or assign royalty, overriding royalty, leasehold or other mineral interest, or to lease the mineral interest in the property under W.S.

2-3-503

, shall show:

The advantage that may accrue to the estate from the lease, mortgage, transfer, sale or assignment;

A general description of the property to be leased, mortgaged, sold or assigned;

The term, rental and general conditions of the proposed lease, transfer, sale or assignment, or the amount, maturity and rate of interest of the proposed mortgage;

The names of the legatees and devisees, if any, and of the heirs of the deceased, or of the minor or incompetent person, lessee, assignee or purchaser, so far as known to the petitioner.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court, if it deems the petition sufficient, shall set the matter for hearing and shall direct to what persons and in what manner notice of the hearing shall be given. At the hearing any person interested in the estate may appear and present objections to the proposed lease, mortgage, sale or assignment. If objections are filed to the petition, the court may adjourn the hearing to enable the parties objecting to fully present their reasons and evidence for and against the proposed lease, mortgage, sale or assignment. If no objections are filed, or if upon hearing the objections are deemed insufficient, the court may order the lease, mortgage, transfer, sale or assignment of royalty, overriding royalty, lease or other mineral interest, or lease of the mineral interest in the property, upon the terms, in the amount and for the period as is deemed proper by the court.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 24, §§ 2, 3; C.S. 1920, §§ 6968, 6969; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 139; R.S. 1931, § 88-3402; C.S. 1945, § 8-202; Laws 1955, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 4-24; W.S. 1977, § 4-5-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-503.
Authorization by court; transfer of mineral interests; terms.

Proceedings may be had in the district court of each Wyoming county in which an estate in probate is being administered or a guardianship proceeding is pending, which involves real property, for authority to transfer, sell or assign royalty, overriding royalty, leasehold or other mineral interest and to lease the mineral content ownership interest in the property of any then deceased person or of any then minor or incompetent person, as distinguished from realty surface leases referred to in W.S.

2-3-501

. If it appears to the court that the transfer, sale or assignment of royalty, overriding royalty, leasehold or other mineral interest or execution and delivery of a lease or contract for exploration and development of the affected real property mineral interest of the decedent, minor or incompetent person, will be advantageous to the estate of the decedent, minor or incompetent person the court, may authorize and direct the trustee, executor or administrator of the probate estate or the guardian of the estate of the minor or incompetent person, to transfer, sell or assign the royalty, overriding royalty, leasehold or other mineral interest or to lease the real estate interest or any part thereof for the mineral content purposes stated. Leases may be for primary terms of five (5) years or less as mutually agreed by the parties thereto and for so long thereafter as the mineral content, including but not restricted to oil, gas or other hydrocarbons, shall or can be produced in commercial quantities from the leasehold premises, or for the term of each unit or cooperative agreement to which the lease may be committed with the consent and approval of the court. The lease is not invalid or voidable because its effectiveness may or will extend beyond the term in office of the lessor, trustee, executor, administrator or guardian, or beyond the time of final settlement of the probate estate, or beyond the minority of the minor or the period of incompetency of the incompetent involved. With the consent and approval of the court any royalty, overriding royalty or other mineral interest or a lease may be committed to a unit or cooperative agreement, or to a secondary recovery agreement, for a like term and with like effect.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 17, § 1; 1955, ch. 25, § 2; 1957, ch. 97, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 4-25; W.S. 1977, § 4-5-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Oil and gas: Rights of royalty owners to take-or-pay settlements, 57 ALR5th 753.

§ 2-3-504.
Authorization by court; transfer of mineral interests; prior leases validated.

All proceedings of the type herein authorized, which have been heretofore concluded in any court aforesaid, substantially consistent with the procedure herein authorized, and all unexpired leases of the kind specified, previously executed and delivered pursuant to each prior proceeding, substantially in conformity with the provisions hereof, are hereby declared valid, as effectively as if this act had been in force upon the date of each prior proceeding and lease.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 17, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 4-26; W.S. 1977, § 4-5-104; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” seems to refer to provisions originally enacted by ch. 17, Laws 1951, which presently appear as §§

2-3-503

and

2-3-504

.

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 17, Laws 1951, provides “Should any part or portion of this act be adjudged invalid, the remaining portion or portions of the same shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such invalidity.”